Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2943
Referral of civil
cases to mediation or alternative dispute resolution; rules of practice.

A court may refer a civil case, including a contested guardianship or contested conservatorship
proceeding, to mediation or another form of alternative dispute
resolution and, unless otherwise ordered following a hearing upon a motion
to object to such referral, may state a date for the case to return to court.
Such date shall be no longer than ninety days after the date the order was
signed unless the court grants an extension upon request of the parties. Any
agreement or resolution made in mediation or another form of alternative dispute
resolution shall be voluntarily entered into by the parties. An individual
trial court, an appellate court, or the Supreme Court on its own initiative
may adopt rules of practice governing the procedures for referral of cases
to mediation and other forms of dispute resolution. Such services may be provided
by approved centers on a sliding scale of fees under the Dispute Resolution
Act.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 3.

Dispute Resolution Act, see section 25-2901.